Vermont statutes. TITLE 10A Vermont Fish and Wildlife Regulations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
§ 9.
Wildlife rehabilitation.

Purpose (

10 V.S.A. § 5215
).

The proper care of distressed wildlife requires special knowledge and facilities not possessed by the general public. The purpose of this Regulation is to establish a licensed group of individuals collectively called wildlife rehabilitators to provide
for the care of injured, debilitated, and in certain cases, orphaned wildlife so that such wildlife may be returned to the wild. Licensed pursuant to Vermont Fish and Wildlife Law,

10 V.S.A. § 5215
(b), the wildlife rehabilitator is authorized to possess sick or injured wildlife and provide necessary aid. It is, therefore, possible to achieve more humane care and an earlier return to the wild.

Nothing in this Regulation authorizes or is intended to authorize a licensed wildlife rehabilitator to practice veterinary medicine in violation of Vermont State Law, Title 26. However, a licensed veterinarian may apply to become a rehabilitator. A rehabilitator
rendering gratuitous services in case of emergency should not attempt diagnosis or treatment beyond his or her level of skill and training. No member of the Fish and Wildlife Department shall become a rehabilitator.

Definitions.

For purposes of this Part:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife.

“Department” means the Department of Fish and Wildlife.

“Permit” means the license to possess wildlife for a limited time issued pursuant to Fish and Wildlife Law,

10 V.S.A. § 5215(b)
.

“Wild animals” means all animals including birds, other than domestic animals, whether or not native to Vermont, including the family canidae, any hybrid with domestic dogs.

“Wildlife rehabilitation” means the practice of providing care for injured or debilitated wild animals including their housing, feeding, emergency treatment and release to the wild.

“Big game” is defined as deer, bear, moose, wild turkey, caribou, elk.

“Orphaned wildlife” is defined as the young of the year whose survival in the wild is not possible without the presence of the mother.

Qualifications for appointment.

A wildlife rehabilitator must:

be over the age of 18 years, a resident of Vermont of good character and reputation in the community as judged by two character references written by persons not related to the applicant or to each other;

not have been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of Vermont Fish and Wildlife Law within the previous three years, nor have been convicted of any misdemeanor or felony within the previous three years;

be interviewed by a State Game Warden employed by the Department to assess the applicant’s proficiency in wildlife rehabilitation;

include in the application:

Name, address, telephone number and date of birth;

Location of facilities;

Related background experience;

Experience and training;

Species of interest (i.e.: mammals/raptors/passerines/amphibians/reptiles/all);

Name and address of veterinarian who has agreed to assist or advise the applicant;

Proof of adequate liability insurance to cover all handlers of wildlife.

Appointment.

Application for appointment as wildlife rehabilitator must be submitted to the Chief Game Warden or his designee. The Chief Game Warden shall investigate and forward his recommendation along with the application to the Commissioner.

Appointment as a wildlife rehabilitator will be made by the Commissioner after a determination that eligibility requirements for appointment have been met.

Appointment will continue until:

terminated by the Commissioner or his designee for just cause pursuant to section 6.

resignation, incapacity or death of the wildlife rehabilitator.

Duties.

The wildlife rehabilitator must:

practice wildlife rehabilitation in a humane and professional manner;

consult licensed veterinarians as necessary to ensure that proper care is administered to injured or debilitated wildlife;

not require payment for the care, treatment or maintenance of wildlife;

comply with applicable provisions of Fish and Wildlife Law and rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto and with the Department’s instructions concerning methods of wildlife rehabilitation, reporting requirements and any conditions contained in
their license;

display in a prominent place the license provided by the Department;

submit to the Department in a timely manner all required records and reports properly executed;

notify the Department at least 90 days in advance of moving his/her place of operation to a new location;

allow authorized Department employees to inspect his/her wildlife rehabilitation operations and records at any reasonable time;

participate in all training programs as may be required by the Department.

Additionally, the wildlife rehabilitator may distribute, if appropriate, to persons who submit wildlife to them any material supplied by the Department relating to wildlife rehabilitation.

Termination of Appointment.

Appointment as wildlife rehabilitator shall be terminated by the Commissioner after a hearing at any time, for any of the following reasons;

the wildlife rehabilitator has ceased to meet the appropriate eligibility requirements for appointment as set forth in this Regulation;

the wildlife rehabilitator has failed to perform duties as provided in this Regulation;

conviction of any Fish and Wildlife Law in this state;

conviction of any law relating to cruelty to animals.

In cases where an appointment is terminated, the Department must hold a hearing upon written request of the wildlife rehabilitator within 20 days of written receipt of the written request. The Commissioner may: uphold the termination, or impose a period
of probational approval of continued appointment.

Limitations.

The wildlife rehabilitator permit is not an authorization for the handling of raptors or other wildlife requiring Federal permits, see section 7(e), nor is the permit a blanket authorization for the rearing of orphaned wildlife. Orphaned wildlife, except
for threatened or endangered species, shall be immediately returned to the wild as soon as they can survive on their own.

Big Game Animals. Rehabilitators will not attempt to rehabilitate any big game animal except as delineated below. (Big game animals are as defined by

10 V.S.A. § 4001
.) Should the rehabilitator receive notification of an injured big game animal or receive an injured big game animal from any member of the public, the rehabilitator shall forthwith notify the nearest available
State Game Warden. The State Game Warden shall handle the big game animal by either returning it to the wild, dispatching it in a humane manner, or, if the animal is a young of the year, he may allow the rehabilitator to
possess the animal until it is well enough to be returned to the wild. If the officer feels the animal could survive if handled in this manner, the officer shall notify Fish and Wildlife Headquarters of the location and
name of the licensed rehabilitator. The determination of whether a big game animal should be dispatched, because of its physical condition, is solely the responsibility of the officer or officers involved, as indicated
by

10 V.S.A. § 4749
relating to deer.

The sale, trade, barter or giving away of any live or dead animal, or parts thereof, is prohibited.

No human contact, other than the licensee, their assistants, and a licensed veterinarian is permitted, nor will any wildlife be viewed by the general public. This section does not preclude Fish and Wildlife Department Wardens or biologists from inspecting
the captive animals in the performance of their duties.

All rehabilitators wishing to handle raptors and threatened or endangered species must have the proper Federal and/or State permits in their possession prior to handling same.

Records—submission. The wildlife rehabilitator shall submit such reports as required by the Commissioner. Such reports shall be filed with the Division of Law Enforcement in Waterbury, Vermont on a monthly basis indicating type of animal, reason for acceptance,
name and address of individual submitting the animal and nature of injuries or illness.

Housing and Feeding of Wildlife.

Wild animals acquired and handled pursuant to this regulation shall be housed, fed and cared for as recommended by the biologists of the Fish and Wildlife Department and the rehabilitators’ consulting veterinarian.

HISTORY:
Added 1989, Fish and Wildlife Board Reg. No. 977, eff. Feb. 1, 1989.

§ 10.
Vermont endangered and threatened species rule.

Authority.

This rule is adopted pursuant to

10 V.S.A. §§ 5402
, 5403, and 5408 which provides that the Secretary “shall adopt by rule a state-endangered species list and a state threatened species list,” and may “adopt rules for the protection and conservation of endangered
and threatened species.”

Purpose.

The purpose of this rule is to identify and list species of wild plants and animals that have been determined by the Secretary to be endangered and threatened in Vermont so that they may be protected under the law. The rule also sets out a process for
Takings and Possession permits.

Definitions.

“Endangered Species” means those species whose continued existence as viable components of the state’s wild flora or fauna is determined to be in jeopardy or determined to be an “endangered species” under the federal Endangered Species Act.

“Listed Species” means any species that appears on the List in Section 5.0 of this rule, or has been determined to be threatened or endangered by other relevant law.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of the Agency of Natural Resources except where otherwise specified.

“Take and taking” with respect to wildlife means pursuing, shooting, hunting, killing, capturing, trapping, snaring and netting fish, birds and quadrupeds and all lesser acts, such as disturbing, harrying or worrying or wounding or placing, setting, drawing
or using any net or other device commonly used to take fish or wild animals, whether they result in the taking or not; and shall include every attempt to take and every act of assistance to every other person in taking or attempting
to take fish or wild animals, provided that when taking is allowed by law, reference is had to taking by lawful means and in lawful manner, and with respect to wild plants means uprooting, transplanting, cutting, injuring or killing
or any attempt to do the same or assisting another who is doing or is attempting to do the same, consistent with the definitions found in

10 V.S.A. §§ 5401
(14) and 4001(23).

“Threatened Species” means those species that are likely within the foreseeable future to become Endangered.

Permits for Taking and Possession.

No person shall take or possess an endangered or threatened species, except when exempted as provided for in

10 V.S.A. § 5408
.

Pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 5408(a)
the Secretary may, after receiving the advice of the Endangered Species Committee, grant permits for the taking and possession of an endangered or threatened species: for scientific purposes; to enhance the propagation
of species; to prevent or mitigate economic hardship; for zoological exhibition; for educational purposes; for noncommercial cultural or ceremonial purposes to a person for the collection and possession of a dead salvage bird or
parts thereof, including bird feathers, provided that the permit issued complies with federal requirements regarding collection and possession of migratory birds and the bird was legally acquired, transferred from an individual
who acquired it legally, or found dead and the permittee had no part in the intentional killing of the bird; or for a special purpose consistent with the purpose of the Federal Endangered Species Act (see

16 U.S.C. § 1531(b))
.

An applicant for a Taking and Possession permit shall submit an administratively complete application to the Secretary, specifying for which purpose(s) the permit is required, as listed in

10 V.S.A. § 5408(a)
.

An administratively complete application shall include all information deemed necessary by the Secretary to evaluate the application. An application shall include a description of the possible impacts due to the proposed action and a plan for conservation
or mitigation. The fee or mitigation proposal as required by 10 V.S.A. ch. 123 shall accompany the application.

Avoidance and Minimization

Applicants for Takings and Possession permits shall have the burden to show that reasonable steps have been taken in to avoid and minimize takings. The Applicant shall provide information that demonstrates:

The proposed activity cannot practicably be designed to avoid taking and still satisfy the basic project purpose; and

If avoidance of taking of a listed species cannot practicably be achieved, the proposed activity has been planned to minimize adverse impacts on the listed species.

The Secretary may require an applicant to submit additional information that the Secretary considers necessary to make a decision on the issuance or denial of a permit. The Secretary may dismiss the application without prejudice if the requested information
is not provided to the Secretary within sixty (60) days of the Secretary’s request.

In determining whether the burden has been met, the Secretary shall evaluate the potential effect of any proposed activity on the basis of both its direct and immediate effects, as well as on the basis of any cumulative or on-going effects on the listed
species.

Mitigation

Mitigation may be required when full compliance with the requirements of 4.5 of this rule is insufficient to achieve no taking.

Mitigation may include permanent conservation of habitat in which the same species exists, ongoing monitoring of conserved areas, and treatment of conserved areas for the purposes of restoration or propagation of listed species.

The mitigation may also include payment of fees to a state “in-lieu fee” program or mitigation fund approved by the Secretary.

Hearings

The Secretary may conduct a non-adversarial, public hearing in order to evaluate the application. Such a hearing will be held within 60 (sixty) days of the receipt of the administratively complete application.

When a petition has been denied and no public hearing has been held, the Applicant may request in writing to the Secretary that a hearing be held regarding the proposed activity. The Secretary will conduct a hearing within 30 (thirty) days of receipt
of the request.

Permit Conditions

The Secretary may require, as part of any issued permit, conditions for the protection and conservation of endangered species, per 10 V.S.A. ch. 123.

The Secretary shall inform an applicant of a decision to approve or deny a permit no more than 60 (sixty) days following an application being deemed administratively complete unless the Secretary determines there is just cause.

The Secretary maintains continuing jurisdiction over activities permitted under this rule and may, at any time, order the permittee to undertake remedial measures to ensure the protection and conservation of listed species.

Listing.

The following list of plants and animals is adopted as the Vermont Endangered and Threatened Species List pursuant to 10 V.S.A. ch. 123.

Plants.

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

No enforcement shall be taken and no permit shall be required for the taking of listed threatened or endangered plants in instances where the plants are legally acquired and exist in a cultivated state or are artificially propagated (produced and grown
under controlled conditions or originated from cultivated parental stock); unless the plants are cultivated or artificially propagated as part of a recovery plan or, for mitigation purposes in accordance with a takings permit,
a directive of the Secretary, or an enforcement action.

Click to view

No enforcement shall be taken and no permit shall be required for the taking of threatened or endangered bees:

for the application of pesticides unless:

The pesticide was not applied in accordance with the applicable federally approved label and state Agency of Agriculture, Food, and Markets (AAFM) regulations or permits; or

The Secretary of the Agency of Natural Resources after consultation with the Secretary of the Agency of Agriculture, has notified a person of the likely presence of threatened or endangered bees, has advised the person to avoid taking the bees or to obtain
a permit, and the person has failed to prevent a taking or obtain a permit.

for otherwise legal activities such as, silviculture, mowing, road maintenance, construction, and painting and staining unless: the Secretary of the Agency of Natural Resources, has notified a person of the likely presence of threatened or endangered
bees, has advised the person to avoid taking the bees or to obtain a permit, and the person has failed to prevent a taking or obtain a permit.

for aerial spraying or other activities under the direction of the Vermont Department of Health (VDH) to address public health threats such as arbovirus. The Secretary shall coordinate with AAFM and VDH to reduce the likelihood of taking bees.

The Secretary may develop best management practices (BMPs) to avoid and minimize the taking of bees. The Secretary shall consult with the AAFM, the Vermont Agency of Transportation, VDH, and any other interested state agency prior to finalizing the BMPs.

Click to view

Click to view

When Scientific Name Common Name Status Listed* PLANTS APIACEAE PARSLEY FAMILY Sanicuia canadensis var. Short-styled snakeroot T 1 canadensis L. Sanicula canadensis var. Greater short-styled T 1 grandis Fern. snakeroot Taenidia integerrima (L.) Drude
Yellow pimpernel T 1 ARACEAE-ARUM FAMILY Arisaema dracontium (L.) Schott Green dragon T 1 ASCLEPIADACEAE-MILKWEED FAMILY Asclepias amplexicaulis Sm. Blunt-leaved milkweed T 1 Asclepias tuberosa L. Butterfly-weed T 1 Asclepias verticillata
L. Whorled Milkweed E 11 ASPLENIACEAE-SPLEENWORT FAMILY Asplenium montanum Willd. Mountain spleenwort T 1 Asplenium viride Huds. Green spleenwort T 1 *(Aspelenium trichomanes- ramosum L.) ASTERACEAE-ASTER FAMILY Eupatorium sessilifolium
L. Sessile-leaved boneset E 4 Helianthus strumosus L. Harsh sunflower T 1 Lactuca hirsuta Muhl. ex Nutt. Hairy lettuce T 5 Nabalus boottii D.C. Boott’s rattlesnake-root E 1 *(Prenanthes boottii (DC.) A. Gray) Omalotheca sylvatica Woodland
cudweed E 4 L. Schultz-Bip. & F.W. Schultz Petasites frigidus var. palmatus (Ait.) Sweet coltsfoot T 1 Cronq. Polymnia canadensis L. White-flowered leafcup E 5, A Solidago odora ssp.odora Ait. Sweet goldenrod T 1 *(Solidago odora
Ait.) Solidago ulmifolia Muhl. ex Willd. Elm-leaved goldenrod E 4, A BETULACEAE-BIRCH FAMILY Betula minor (Tuckerman) Fern. Dwarf birch E 11 BLECHNACEAE-CHAIN FERN FAMILY Woodwardia virginica (L.) Sm. Virginia chain-fern T 1 BORAGINACEAE-BORAGE
FAMILY Cynoglossum virginianum Northern wild comfrey T 1 var. boreale (Fern.) Cooperider Hackelia deflexa (Wahlenb) Opiz Nodding stickseed T 1 ssp. americana (Gray) A. & D. Love BRASSICACEAE-MUSTARD FAMILY Arabidopsis lyrata Lyre-leaved
rock-cress T 1 (L.) O’Kane & Al-Shehbaz *(Arabis lyrata L.) Boechera stricta (Graham) Drummond’s rock-cress E 4 *(Arabis drummondii A. Gray)

When Scientific Name Common Name Status Listed Braya humilis (C.A. Mey.) B.L. Rob. Northern rock-cress T 1 Draba canna Rydb. Hoary draba T 1 *(Draba breweri var. cana (Rydb.) Rollins) Draba glabella Pursh Smooth draba T 1 Rorippa aquatica Lake-cress T
1 (Eaton) E.J. Palmer & Steyermark *(Neobeckia aquatica (Eaton) Greene BRYACEAE-BRYUM MOSS FAMILY Plagiobryum zieri (Hedw.) Lindb. A moss E 3 CAPRIFOLIACEAE-HONEYSUCKLE FAMILY Viburnum edule (Michx.) Raf. Squashberry T 1 CARYOPHYLLACEAE-PINK
FAMILY Minuartia marcescens Marcescent sandwort T 1 (Fern.) House Minuartia rubella Marble sandwort T 1 (Wahlenb.) Hiern CISTACEAE-ROCK-ROSE FAMILY Crocanthemum bicknellii (Fern) Janchen Plains frostweed T 1 *(Helianthemum bicknellii
Fern.) Hudsonia tomentosa Nutt. Beach heather E 1 Lechea mucronata Raf. Hairy pinweed E 4 CLUSIACEAE- ST. JOHN’S-WORT FAMILY Hypericum ascyron L. Great St. John’s-wort T 1 CONVOLVULACEAE- MORNING-GLORY FAMILY Calystegia spithamaeus
ssp. Low bindweed T 1 spithamaea (L.) Pursh *(Calystegia spithamaeus (L.) Pursh) CORNACEAE-DOGWOOD FAMILY Cornus florida L. Flowering dogwood T 1 CRASSULACEAE-STONECROP FAMILY Rhodiola rosea L. Roseroot T 1 *(Sedum rosea L. Scop.)
CUPRESSACEAE-CYPRESS FAMILY Juniperus horizontalis Moench Creeping juniper T 1 CYPERACEAE-SEDGE FAMILY Carex arcta Boott Contracted sedge E 4 Carex atratiformis Britt. Blackish sedge T 1 Carex buxbaumii Walenb. Buxbaum’s sedge E 1
Carex capillaris ssp. Capillary sedge T 1 *(Carex capillaris L.) capillaris L. Carex chordorrhiza Ehrh, ex L. f. Creeping sedge E 4 Carex foenea Willd. Bronze sedge E 4 Carex garberi Fern. Garber’s sedge T 1 Carex livida (Wahlenb.)
Willd. Pale sedge T 1 Carex muehlenbergii var. enervis Boott Nerveless Muehlenberg sedge T 1 Carex muehlenbergii var. muehlenbergii Schkuhr ex Willd. Muehlenberg’s sedge T 1 Carex oligocarpa Schkuhr ex Willd. Few-fruited sedge E 4
Carex richardsonii R. Br. Richardson’s sedge E 1 Carex siccata Dewey Hay sedge E 4 Carex vaginata Tausch Sheathed sedge E 4 Cyperus diandrus Torr. Low cyperus E 3 Cyperus houghtonii Torr. Houghton’s cyperus T 1 Eleocharis quinqueflora
(Hartmann) O. Schwarz Few-flowered spike rush T 1 *(Eleocharis pauciflora (Lightf.) Link) Fimbristylis autumnalis (L.) Roem. & Schult. Autumn fimbristylis E 4 Rhynchospora capillacea Torr. Capillary beak-rush T 1 Scirpus ancistrochaetus
Schuyler Barbed-bristle bulrush E 4, A Trichophorum planifolium (Spreng.) Palla Bashful bulrush E 4, A *(Scirpus verecundus Fern.) DIAPENSIACEAE-DIAPENSIA FAMILY Diapensia lapponica ssp. lapponica L. Diapensia E 1 *(Diapensia lapponica
L.) DRYOPTERIDACEAE-WOOD FERN FAMILY Dryopteris filix-mas (L.) Schott Male Fern T 1 Woodsia alpina (Bolton) S.F. Gray Alpine woodsia E 1 EQUISETACEAE-HORSETAIL FAMILY Equisetum palustre L. Marsh horsetail T 1 ERICACEAE-HEATH FAMILY
Pterospora andromedea Nutt. Pinedrops E 4 Pyrola asarifoliea ssp. asarifolia Michx. Bog wintergreen T 4 *(Pyrola asarifoliea ssp. asarifolia Michx.) Pyrola minor L. Lesser pyrola E 1 Rhododendron maximum L. Great laurel T 1 Vaccinium
stamineum L. Deerberry E 5 FABACEAE-PEA FAMILY Astragalus canadensis var. Canadian milk-vetch T 1 canadensis L. *(Astragalus canadensis L.) Astragalus robbinsii var. jesupii Jessup’s milk-vetch E 1 Egglst. & Sheldon Crotalaria
sagittalis L. Rattlebox T 1 Desmodium cuspidatum (Muhl. ex Willd.) DC ex Loud. Large-bracted tick-trefoil E 4 Desmondium rotundifolium DC. Prostrate tick-trefoil T 1 Lathyrus japonicus var. maritimus (L.) Kartesz & Gandhi Beach-pea
T 1 *(Lathyrus maritimus (L.)Bigelow) Lathyrus palustris L. Marsh vetchling T 1 Lespedeza frutescens (L.) Hornem Violet bush-cover T 1 *(Lespedeza violacea auct. 1 Lespedeza violacea (L.) Pers. is now what was formerly known as L.
intermedia (S. Watts) Britton and is not listed non (L.) Pers) Lespedeza hirta ssp. Hairy bush-clover T 4 hirta (L.) Hornem. *(Lespedeza hirta (L.) Hornem.) Lupinus perennis L. Wild lupine E 6, A Senna hebecarpa (Fern.) Wild senna
T 1 Irwin & Barneby FAGACEAE-BEECH FAMILY Quercus ilicifolia Wangenh. Scrub oak E 4 Quercus prinoides Willd. Dwarf chinquapin oak E 7 GENTIANACEAE-GENTIAN FAMILY Gentiana andrewsii Griseb. Fringe-top closed gentian T 1 Gentianella
amarella (L.) Boerner Felwort T 1 Gentianella quinquefolia (L.) Small Stiff gentian T 1 HYDROPHYLLACEAE- WATERLEAF FAMILY Hydrophyllum canadense (L.) Broad-leaved waterleaf T 1 ISOETACEAE-QUILLWORT FAMILY Isoetes engelmannii A. Braun
Engelmann’s quillwort T 1 Isoetes viridimontana Green Mountain E 11 M. Rosenthal and W.C. Taylor quillwort JUNCACEAE-RUSH FAMILY Juncus greenei Oakes & Tuckerm. Greene’s rush E 4 Juncus militaris Bigelow Soldier rush E 4 Juncus
secundus Beauv. ex Poir. Secund rush E 4

When Scientific Name Common Name Status Listed JUNICAGINACEAE-ARROW-GRASS FAMILY Triglochin maritima L. Arrow-grass E 8 LAMIACEAE-MINT FAMILY Agastache nepetoides (L.) Kuntze Yellow giant hyssop T 1 Agastache scrophulariifolia (Willd.) Kuntze Purple giant
hyssop T 1 Blephilia hirsuta var. glabrata (Fern.) Smooth wood-mint T 1 *(Blephilia hirsuta (Pursh.) Benth.) Blephilia hirsuta var. hirsuta (Pursh.) Benth. Hairy wood-mint T 1 *(Blephilia hirsuta (Pursh.) Benth.) Dracocephalum parviflorum
Nutt. American dragonhead T 1 Physostegia virginiana (L.) Benth. Obedient plant T 1 Pycnanthemum incanum (L.) Michx. Hoary mountain mint E 4 LENTIBULARIACEAE- BLADDERWORT FAMILY Utricularia resupinata B.D. Greene Northeastern bladder-
T 1 ex Bigelow wort LILIACEAE-LILY FAMILY Allium canadense var. Wild garlic T 1 canadense L. *(allium canadense L.) Anticlea glauca (Nutt.) Kunth White camas E 10 LYGODIACEAE-CLIMBING FERN FAMILY Lygodium palmatum (Bernh.) Sw. Climbing
fern E 1 MAGNOLIACEAE- MAGNOLIA FAMILY Liriodendron tuplipfera L. Tulip tree E 11 MELASTOMATACEAE- MEADOW-BEAUTY FAMILY Rhexia virginica L. Virginia meadow-beauty T 1 MORACEAE-MULBERRY FAMILY Morus rubra L. Red mulberry T 1 NYMPHACEAE-WATER-LILY
FAMILY Nymphaea leibergii Morong. Pygmy water-lily E 7 ONAGRACEAE-EVENING PRIM- ROSE FAMILY Ludwigia polycarpa Short & Peter Many-fruited false- loosestrife E 1 OPHIOGLOSSACEAE-ADDER’S- TONGUE FAMILY Botrychium minganense Vict.
Mingan moonwort E 1 ORCHIDACEAE-ORCHID FAMILY Aplectrum hyemale (Muhl. ex Willd.)Nutt. Putty-root T 1 Arethusa bulbosa L. Arethusa T 1 Calypso bulbosa var. Fairy slipper T 1 americana (R. Br. ex Ait. f.) Luer *(Calypso bulbosa (L.)
Oakes) Corallorhiza odontorhiza var. Autumn coral-root T 1 odontorhiza (Willd.) Nutt *(Corallorhiza odontorhiza (Willd.) Nutt.) Cypripedium arietinum Ait. f. Ram’s head lady’s-slipper T 1 Isotria medeoloides (Pursh) Raf. Small whorled
pogonia E 4 Isotria verticillata Raf. Large whorled pogonia T 1 Liparis liliifolia (L.) L.C. Rich. Lily-leaved twayblade T 1 ex Ker-Gawl. Malaxis monophyllos var brachypode (Gray) Morris & Eames White adder’s mouth T 1 *(Malaxis
brachypoda (A. Gray) Neottia auriculata (Weig.) Szlach. Auricled twayblade E 1 *(Listeria auriculato Weig.) Neottia bifolia (Raf.) Baumbach Southern twayblade E 1 *(Listera australis Lindl.) Platanthera flava var. herbiola Tubercled
orchis T 1 (R. Br. ex Ait. f.) Luer *(Platanthera flava (L.) Lindl.) Platanthera hookeri (Torr. ex Gray) Hooker’s orchis T 1 Lindl. Triphora trianthophora (Sw.) Rydb. Three-birds orchid T 1 OROBANCHACEAE-CANCER-ROOT FAMILY Castilleja
septentrionalis Lindl. Northern-painted-cup T 1 PAPAVERACEAE-POPPY FAMILY Corydalis aurea Willd. Golden corydalis T 1 PINACEAE-PINE FAMILY Pinus banksiana Lamb. Jack pine T 1 PLANTAGINACEAE-PLANTAIN FAMILY Hippuris vulgaris L. Mare’s
tail E 4 Veronicastrum virginicum Culver’s-root E 1 (L.) Farw. POACEAE-GRASS FAMILY Ammophila breviligulata ssp. Champlain beach grass E 1 champlainensis (Seymour) Walker, Paris, & Barrington ex Bankworth *(Ammophila champlainensis
Sey- mour) Anthoxanthum monticola ssp. Alpine sweet-grass T 1 monticola (Bigelow) Veldkamp *(Hierochloe alpina (Swartz) R. & S.; Anthoxanthum monticola (Bigelow) Veldkamp) Calamagrostis pickeringii A. Pickering’s reed-grass E 8
Gray, Man. Calamagrostis stricta ssp. inexpansa Bentgrass E 4 (Gray) C.W. Greene Glyceria acutiflora Torr. Sharp manna-grass E 4 Panicum flexile (Gattinger) Scribn. Stiff witch-grass E 4 Piptatheropsis pungens Slender mountain-rice
T 4 (Torr ex Spreng.) Romasch., P.M. Peterson, & Serong *(Oryzopsis pungens (Torr.) Hitchc.; Piptatherum pungens (Torr. ex Spreng. Dorn) Sphenopholis nitida (Biehler) Scribn. Shiny wedgegrass E 4 Sphenopholis obtusata (Michx.)
Scribn. Blunt spenopholis E 4 Sporobolus compositus (Poir.) Merr. Rough dropseed E 1 *(Sporobolus asper (Michx.) Kunth) Vulpia octoflora (Walt.) Rydb. Eight-flowered fescue E 4 POLEMONIACEAE-PHLOX FAMILY Polemonium vanbruntiae Britt.
Eastern Jacob’s ladder T 1 POLYGONACEAE-BUCKWHEAT FAMILY Polygonum douglasii Greene Douglas’ knotweed E 4 PRIMULACEAE-PRIMROSE FAMILY Primula mistassinica Michx. Bird’s-eye primrose T 1 PTERIDACEAE-MAIDENHAIR FERN FAMILY Adiantum viridimontanum
Paris Green Mountain maid- T 5 enhair

When Scientific Name Common Name Status Listed RANUNCULACEAE-BUTTERCUP FAMILY Anemone multifida var. Early thimbleweed E 1 multifida Poir. *(Anemone multifida Poir.) Hydrastis canadensis L. Golden-seal E 1 Ranunculus allegheniensis Britt. Allegheny crowfoot
T 4 RHAMNACEAE-BUCKTHORN FAMILY Ceanothus herbaceus Raf. Prairie red-root E 1 ROSACEAE-ROSE FAMILY Potentilla litoralis Rydb. Northern cinquefoil E 4 *(Potentilla pensylvanica L. var. bipinnatifida (Douglas) T. & G.) Prunus americana
Marsh. Wild plum T 1 Prunus susquehanae Willd. Susquehanna sand cherry E 10 Rosa acicularis ssp. sayi Needle-spine rose E 4 (Schwein.) W.H. Lewis *(rosa acicularis Lindl.) RUBIACEAE-MADDER FAMILY Galium labradoricum (Wieg.) Wieg. Bog
bedstraw T 1 SALICACEAE-WILLOW FAMILY Salix plainifolia Pursh Tea-leaved willow T 1 Salix uva-ursi Pursh Bearberry willow E 1 SCHEUCHZERIACEAE-SCHEUCHZERIA FAMILY Scheuchzeria palustria L. Pod-grass T 1 SPARGANIACEAE-BUR-REED FAMILY
Sparganium natans L. Lesser bur-reed T 4 SPHAGNACEAE-SPHAGNUM FAMILY Sphagnum subfulvum Sjors A peat moss E 3 *(Sphagnum nitidum Warnstorf) TOFIELDIACEAE-FALSE ASPHODEL FAMILY Triantha glutinosa (Michx.) Baker Sticky false-asphodel
T 1 *(Tofieldia glutinosa (Michx.) Baker) ULMACEAE-ELM FAMILY Ulmus thomasii Sarg. Rock elm T 8 VALERIANACEAE-VALERIAN FAMILY Valeriana uliginosa (Torr. & Gray) Rydb. Marsh valerian E 1 VIOLACEAE-VIOLET FAMILY Viola lanceolata
ssp. Lance-leaved violet T 1 lanceolata L. *(Viola lanceolata L.) XYRIDACEAE-YELLOW-EYED GRASS FAMILY Xyris montana Ries Yellow-eyed grass T 1

When Scientific Name Common Name Status Listed 5.3 AMPHIPODS CRANGONYCTIDAE-A GAMMARID AMPHIPOD FAMILY Stygobromus borealis Taconic cave amphipod E 5 5.4 INSECTS 5.4.1 APIDAE-BEE FAMILY Bombus affinis Rusty-patched Bumble Bee E 11 Bombus ashtoni Ashton
Cuckoo Bumble Bee E 11 Bombus terricola Yellow-banded Bumble Bee T 11

When Scientific Name Common Name Status Listed 5.4.4 CICINDELIDAE-TIGER BEETLE FAMILY Cicindela hirticollis Hairy-necked tiger beetle T 5 beetle Cicindela marginipennis Cobblestone tiger T 1 beetle Cicindela puritana Puritan tiger beetle T 5 5.5 MOLLUSKS
MARGARITIFERIDAE-PEARL MUSSEL FAMILY Margaritifera margaritifera Eastern pearlshell T 5 UNIONIDAE-UNIONID MUSSEL FAMILY Alasmidonta heterodon Dwarf wedge mussel E 4, A Alasmidonta varicosa Brook floater T 5 Anodontoides ferussacianus
Cylindrical papershell E 6 Lampsilis ovata Pocketbook E 6 Lasmigona costata Fluted-shell E 6 Leptodea fragilis Fragile papershell E 6 Ligumia recta Black sand shell E 6, B Potamilus alatus Pink heelsplitter E 6 Pyganodon grandis Giant
floater T 6 5.6 FISH ACIPENSERIDAE-STURGEON FAMILY Acipenser fulvescens Lake sturgeon E 1 ICTALURIDAE-NORTH AMERICAN FRESHWATER CATFISH FAMILY Noturus flavus Stonecat E 5 PERCIDAE-PERCH FAMILY Ammocrypta pellucida Eastern sand darter
T 1 Percina copelandi Channel darter E 6 PETROMYZONTIDAE-LAMPREY FAMILY Ichthyomyzon fossor Northern brook lamprey E 4, A Lethenteron appendix American brook lamprey T 1 *(Lampetra appendix)

=font8 *Date listed: 1 = 04-13-87 2 = 07-30-88 3 = 06-23-89 4 = 11-09-91 5 = 12-07-94 6 = 03-18-99 7 = 04-23-05 8 = 02-16-11 9 = 07-15-11 10 = 11-15-12 11 = 3-28-2015 A = listed as threatened on 04-13-87 B = listed as threatened on 12-07-94 C = listed
as threatened on 06-23-89 *Indicates a name change (synonym or different taxonomic level) from a previous Vermont Endangered and Threatened Species list

HISTORY:
Added 1989, Regulation of the Secretary Agency of Natural Resources, eff. June 23, 1989; amended 1991, Regulation of the Secretary of Agency of Natural Resources, eff. Nov. 9, 1991; amended 1995, Regulation of the Secretary
of Agency of Natural Resources, eff. Dec. 7, 1994; amended 1999, Regulation of the Secretary of Agency of Natural Resources, eff. Mar. 18, 1999; 2005 Regulation of the Secretary of Agency of Natural Resources, eff. April 28, 2005;
2011 Regulation of the Secretary of Agency of Natural Resources, eff. July 15, 2011; 2012 Regulation of the Secretary of Agency of Natural Resources, eff. Nov. 15, 2012;

2014, No. 116
(Adj. Sess.), § 13; 2015 Regulation of the Secretary of Agency of Natural Resources, eff. March 28, 2015.